District of Columbia statutes.
31-405

Audit committee.

Every controlled insurer shall have an audit committee of the board of directors composed of independent directors. The audit committee shall annually meet with management, the insurer’s independent certified public accountants, and an independent casualty actuary, or other independent loss reserve specialist acceptable to the Mayor, to review the adequacy of the insurer’s loss reserves.

Oct. 21, 1993, D.C. Law 10-52, § 6, 40 DCR 6129
This section is referenced in § 31-403.
1981 Ed., § 35-4005.